Hawaii statutes.
[§431N-2] Definitions. As used
in this chapter unless otherwise indicated by the context:

"Gap group individuals" means
medically uninsured persons who are residents of the State.

"Health care contractor" means any
medical group or organization which undertakes, under a prepaid health care
program, to provide health care, or any nonprofit organization or insurer who
undertakes, under a prepaid health care program, to defray or reimburse in
whole or part, the expenses of health care.

"Health care coverage" means
contractually arranged medical, personal, or other services, including
preventive services, education, case management, and outreach, provided to an
eligible member.

"Medical indigence" means the status
of a person who is uninsured or lacks medical insurance. [L 1989, c 378, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next